Hawaii statutes.
§667-17 Attorney
affirmation in judicial foreclosure. [Section repealed July 1, 2017. L 2012, c 182, §69(1)(A). See
also §667-18.] Any attorney who files on behalf
of a mortgagee seeking to foreclose on a residential property under this part
shall sign and submit an affirmation that the attorney has verified the
accuracy of the documents submitted, under penalty of perjury and subject to
applicable rules of professional conduct. The affirmation shall be filed with
the court at the time that the action is commenced and shall be in
substantially the following form:

"_____CIRCUIT
COURT OF THE STATE OF HAWAII

_______________________________________________

Plaintiff,

AFFIRMATION

v.

Defendant(s)

Mortgaged
Premises:

_____________________

______________________________________________

Note:
During and after August 2010, numerous and widespread insufficiencies

in
foreclosure filings in various courts around the nation were reported by major

mortgage
lenders and other authorities, including failure to review documents

and
files to establish standing and other foreclosure requisites; filing of
notarized

affidavits
that falsely attest to such review and to other critical facts in the

foreclosure
process; and “robosignature” of documents.

* * *

[____________], Esq., pursuant to
Hawaii Revised Statutes §667-17 and under the penalties of perjury, affirms as
follows:

1. I am an attorney at law duly
licensed to practice in the State of Hawaii and am affiliated with the Law Firm
of __________________, the attorneys of record for Plaintiff in the
above-captioned mortgage foreclosure action. As such, I am fully aware of the
underlying action, as well as the proceedings had herein.

2. On [date], I communicated with
the following representative or representatives of Plaintiff, who informed me
that he/she/they (a) personally reviewed plaintiff's documents and records
relating to this case for factual accuracy; and (b) confirmed the factual
accuracy of the allegations set forth in the Complaint and any supporting affidavits
or affirmations filed with the Court, as well as the accuracy of the
notarizations contained in the supporting documents filed therewith.

Name Title

______________________________ ________________________

______________________________ ________________________

______________________________ ________________________

3. Based upon my communication with
[persons specified in item 2], as well as upon my own inspection and other
reasonable inquiry under the circumstances, I affirm that, to the best of my
knowledge, information, and belief, the Summons, Complaint, and other papers
filed or submitted to the Court in this matter contain no false statements of
fact or law and that plaintiff has legal standing to bring this foreclosure
action. I understand my continuing obligation to amend this Affirmation in
light of newly discovered material facts following its filing.

4. I am aware of my obligations
under Hawaii Rules of Professional Conduct.

____________________________________

DATED:

N.B.: Counsel may
augment this affirmation to provide explanatory details,

and
may file supplemental affirmations or affidavits for the same purpose."

[L 2012, c 182, pt of §3(3); am L 2014, c 37, §1]

Previous
Vol13_Ch0601-0676
Next